District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.28

Articles of incorporation and bylaws.

A universal bank may operate under the articles of incorporation and bylaws which were in effect before the universal bank’s certification as a universal bank or under subsequently amended articles of incorporation and bylaws which are consistent with the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 228, 48 DCR 3244